Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13l. new text end new text begin Coverage and payment for certain pharmacy services. new text end new text begin (a) Medical assistance covers services provided by a licensed pharmacist under the coverage for services provided by a licensed physician to the extent the licensed pharmacist's services are within both a pharmacist's and physician's scope of practice. new text end new text begin (b) This subdivision applies to licensed pharmacist services provided: new text end new text begin (1) under fee-for-service medical assistance; or new text end new text begin (2) by a managed care plan under section 256B.69 or a county-based purchasing plan under section 256B.692. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner, and managed care and county-based purchasing plans when providing services under sections 256B.69 and 256B.692, must reimburse a participating pharmacist or pharmacy for a service that is within both a pharmacist's and physician's scope of practice at an amount no lower than the standard payment rate applied when reimbursing a physician for the service. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services must notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Coverage and payment for certain pharmacy services. new text end new text begin MinnesotaCare must cover and pay for pharmacy services in compliance with the requirements for medical assistance specified under section 256B.0625, subdivision 13l. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services must notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end